506 CHAPTER 16
1861 Great Britain and
France decide to buy cot-
ton from Egypt instead of
from the Confederacy.
1863 The
Emancipation Proclamation is issued on January 1.
1862 The Monitor fights the Virginia on March 9.
1862
1862 An
imperial decree expels foreigners from Japan.
1864 With the support of French troops, Archduke Maximilian of Austria becomes emperor of Mexico.
1864 The Taiping Rebellion in China ends after the capture of Nanjing in July.
1865 General Robert E. Lee surrenders to General Ulysses S. Granton April 9.
THE CIVIL WAR 50
Reading Social Studies
Economics	Geography
Politics
Society and Culture
Science and Technology
Focus on Themes As you read this chapter about the Civil War, you will see that this was a time in our history dominated by two major concerns: politics and society and culture. You will not only read about the political decisions made during this
war, but also you will see how the war affected all of American society. You will read about the causes and the key events during the war and the many consequences of this war. This chapter tells of one of the most important events in our history.

Summarizing
FOCUS
On Reading After reading a large amount of information, you can summarize it into a shorter amount that is easier for you to understand. Understanding Summarizing Using the ideas and information presented in a book can be easier if you summarize what the author is sayinr. When you summarize, you can use some of the key ideas and words to write your own sentences that explain the information. When you write a summary, some details can be left out.
Read the following passage and its summary. Notice which details the author chose to include and which to leave out.

Civil War armies fought in the ancient battlefield formation that produced massive casualties. Endless rows of troops fired directly at one another, with cannonballs landing amid them. When the order was given, soldiers would attach bayonets to their guns and rush toward their enemy. Men died to gain every inch of ground...
nnMMMM
Summary
Battles in the Civil War were brutal. The weapons that the troops used—cannons and guns with bayonets—led to many deaths.
From
Chapter 16, p.533
I
I
This passage contains most of the same information but is shorter. Notali of the information is included.

508 CHAPTER 16
The following passage is from the chapter you are getting ready to read. As you read the passage, look for information that is important enough to go in a summary.
As the months rolled on and the number of dead continued to increase, a group of northern Democrats began speaking out against the war. Led by U.S. Representative Clement L. Vallandigham of Ohio, they called themselves Peace Democrats. Their enemies called them Copperheads, comparing them to a poisonous snake. The name stuck.
Many Copperheads were midwestemers who sympathized with the South and opposed abolition. They believed the war was not necessary and called for its end. Vallandigham asked what the war had gained, and then said, "Let the dead at Fredericksburg and Vicksburg answer."
J
After you read the passage, answer the following questions.
1.	Do you think the quote in the passage above is essential information for a summary of the issue being discussed?
2.	Do you think the name "Copperheads" should be included in your summary?
3.	Write a three or four sentence summary of the passage above. Be sure to use standard spelling, grammar, sentence structure, and punctuation.
4.	With a partner, choose a paragraph from the chapter to read aloud. Have your partner summarize the paragraph. Then switch roles and summarize a paragraph that your partner reads.
Section 1
Fort Sumter (p. 511) border states Ip. 512)
Winfield Scott (p. 513) cotton diplomacy (p. 513)
Section 2
Thomas "Stonewall" Jackson Ip. 517) First Battle of Bull Run (p. 517)
George B. McClellan (p. 517)
Robert E. Lee Ip. 518)
Seven Days' Battles Ip. 518)
Second Battle of Bull Run (p. 518) Battle of Antietam (p. 519) ironclads (p. 520)
Section 3
Ulysses S. Grant Ip. 522)
Battle of Shiloh (p. 523)
David Farragut Ip. 524)
Siege of Vicksburg (p. 524)
Section 4
emancipation Ip. 529)
Emancipation Proclamation (p. 529) contrabands Ip. 531)
54th Massachusetts Infantry (p. 531) Copperheads (p. 532) habeas corpus Ip. 532)
Clara Barton Ip. 534)
Section 5
Battle of Gettysburg Ip. 537)
George Pickett Ip. 539)
Pickett's Charge Ip. 539)
Gettysburg Address (p. 540) Wilderness Campaign Ip. 540) William Tecumseh Sherman (p. 541) total war Ip. 542)
Appomattox Courthouse (p. 542)
Academic Vocabulary
In this chapter, you will learn the following academic words:
innovation (p. 520)
execute Ip. 540)
As you read Chapter 16, practice summarizing the information from several paragraphs.

THE CIVIL WAR 5*
TEKS 1A, 8A, 8B, 8C, 10A, IOC
The War Begins
What You Will Learn...
1.	Following the outbreak of war at Fort Sumter, Americans chose sides.
2.	The Union and the Confederacy prepared for war.
T
The Big Idea
Civil war broke out between the North and the South in 1861.
Key Terms and People
Fort Sumter, p. 511 border states, p. 512 Winfield Scott, p. 513 cotton diplomacy, p. 513
hmhsocialstudies.com
I TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on how Americans chose sides in the Civil War and how each side prepared for the war.
If YOU were there...
You are a college student in Charleston in early 1861. Seven southern states have left the Union and formed their own government. All-out war seems unavoidable. Your friends have begun to volunteer for either the Union or the Confederate forces. You are tom between loyalty to your home state and to the United States. Would you join the Union or the Confederate army?
BUILDING BACKGROUND
The divisions within the United States reached a breaking point with the election of Abraham Lincoln in 1860. Several southern states angrily left the Union to form a new confederation. In border states such as Virginia and Kentucky, people were divided. The question now was whether the United States could survive as a disunified country. Americans Choose Sides
Furious at Lincoln's election and fearing a federal invasion, seven southern states had seceded. The new commander in chief tried desperately to save the Union.
In his inaugural address, Lincoln promised not to end slavery where it existed. The federal government "will not assail [attack] you. You can have no conflict without being yourselves the aggressors," he said, trying to calm southerners' fears. However, Lincoln also stated his intention to preserve the Union. He believed that saving the Union would help to save democracy. If the Union and its government failed, then monarchs could say that people were unable to rule themselves. As a result, Lincoln refused to recognize secession, declaring the Union to be "unbroken."
Infact, after decades of painful compromises, the Union was badly broken. From the lower South, a battle cry was arising, bom out of fear, rage—and excitement. Confederate officials began seizing branches of the federal mint, arsenals, and military outposts. In a last ditch effort to avoid war between the states, Secretary of State Seward suggested a united effort of threatening war against Spain and France for interfering in Mexico and the Caribbean. In the highly charged atmosphere, it would take only a spark to unleash the heat of war.
510 CHAPTER 16
Charleston
History Close-up
Fort Sumter
Castle Pinckney
In Charleston, all activity came to a complete stop. Citizens crowded rooftops to watch the battle.

Fort
Johnson

Cummings
Point
C h a r ‘8 J H a r h or
Shots fired at the ironclad battery did little damage.
Fort
Sumter
Fort Sumter was strategically placed to control Charleston Harbor.
GEOGRAPHY g	-
SKILLS INTERPRETING MAPS I
Zloultrie
The first shots of the Civil War were fired at Fort Sumter, South Carolina. Although no one was killed there, the bloodiest
war in the country's history had begun.
1.	Human-Environment Interaction M|
would the Union Army need to resupply Fort Sumter?
2.	Place What advantages would a floating battery have?
In 1861, that spark occurred at Fort Sumter, a federal outpost in Charleston, South Carolina, that was attacked by Confederate troops, beginning the Civil War. Determined to seize the fortress—which controlled the entrance to Charleston harbor— the Confederates ringed the harbor with heavy guns. Instead of surrendering the fort, Lincoln decided to send in ships to provide badly needed supplies to defend the fort. Confederate officials demanded that the federal troops evacuate. The fort's commander, Major Robert Anderson, refused.
Before sunrise on April 12,1861, Confederate guns opened fire on Fort Sumter. A witness wrote that the first shots brought "every soldier in the harbor to his feet, and every man, woman, and child in the city of Charleston from their beds." The Civil War had begun.
The fort, although massive, stood little chance. Its heavy guns faced the Atlantic Ocean, not the shore. After 34 hours of cannon blasts, Fort Sumter surrendered. "The last ray of hope for preserving the Union has expired at the assault upon Fort Sumter ..." Lincoln wrote.
Reaction to Lincoln's Call
The fall of Fort Sumter stunned the North. Lincoln declared the South to be in a state of rebellion and asked state governors for 75,000 militiamen to put down the rebellion. States now had to choose: Would they secede, or would they stay in the Union? Democratic Senator Stephen Douglas, speaking in support of Lincoln's call for troops, declared, "There can be no neutrals in this war, only patriots—or traitors."
THE CIVIL WAR 5
North Versus South
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS INTERPRETING MAPS
Place Where were the four border states located in relation to the Union and Confederate states?
IW1
Union states 1 | Confederate states B
Border states (Part of the Union)
1	| Territories
West Virginia (Separated from Virginia in 1861 and joined the Union in 1863)
Pennsylvania, New Jersey, and the states north of them rallied to the president's call. The crucial slave states of the Upper South—North Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, and Arkansas—seceded. They provided soldiers and supplies to the South. Mary Boykin Chesnut, whose husband became a Confederate congressman, wrote in her diary:
** I did not know that one could live in such days of excitement... Everybody tells you half of something, and then rushes off.. .to hear the lastnews/^
—Mary Boykin Chesnut, quoted in MaryChesnut's Civil War, edited by C. Vann Woodward
Wedged between the North and the South were the key border states of Delaware, Kentucky, Maryland, and Missouri—slave states that did not join the Confederacy. Kentucky and Missouri controlled parts of important rivers. Maryland separated the Union capital, Washington, D.C., from the North.
People in the border states were deeply divided on the war. The president's own
wife, Mary Todd Lincoln, had four brothers from Kentucky who fought for the Confederacy. Lincoln sent federal troops into the border states to help keep them in the Union. He also sent soldiers into western Virginia, where Union loyalties were strong. West Virginia set up its own state government in 1863.
Northern Resources
Numbers tell an important story about the Civil War. Consider the North's advantages. It could draw soldiers and workers from a population of 22 million. The South had only 5.5 million people to draw from. One of the greatest advantages in the North was the region's network of roads, canals, and railroads. Some 22,000 miles of railroad track could move soldiers and supplies throughout the North. The South had only about 9,000 miles of track.
In the North, the Civil War stimulated economic growth. To supply the military, the
512 CHAPTER 16
production of coal, iron, wheat, and wool increased. Also, the export of com, wheat, beef, and pork to Europe doubled. In the South, the export of resources decreased because of the Union blockade.
Finally, the Union had money. It had a more developed economy, banking system, and a currency called greenbacks. The South had to start printing its own Confederate dollars. Some states printed their own money, too. This led to financial chaos.
Taking advantage of the Union's strengths, General Winfield Scott developed a two-part strategy: (1) destroy the South's economy with a naval blockade of southern ports; (2) gain control of the Mississippi River to divide the South. Other leaders urged an attack on Richmond, Virginia, the Confederate capital.
The South hoped to wear down the North and to capture Washington, D.C. Confederate president Jefferson Davis also tried to win foreign allies through cotton diplomacy. This was the idea that Great Britain would support the Confederacy because it needed the South's raw cotton to supply its booming textile industry. Cotton diplomacy did not work as the South had hoped. Britain had large supplies of cotton, and it got more from India and Egypt.
READING CHECK
Comparing What advantages did the North and South have leading up to the war?
Resources of the North and South
Southern Resources
The Confederacy had advantages as well. With its strong military tradition, the South put many brilliant officers into battle. Southern farms provided food for its armies. The South's best advantage, however, was strategic. It needed only to defend itself until the North grew tired of fighting.
The North had to invade and control the South. To accomplish this, the Union army had to travel huge distances. For example, the distance from northern Virginia to central Georgia is about the length of Scotland and England combined. Because of distances such as this, the North had to maintain long supply lines.
In addition, wilderness covered much of the South. Armies found this land difficult to cross. Also, in Virginia, many of the rivers ran from east to west. Because of this, they formed a natural defense against an army that attacked from the north to the south. As a result, Northern generals were often forced to attack Confederate troops from the side rather than from the front. Furthermore, because southerners fought mostly on their home soil, they were often familiar with the area.
North South
‘Southern exports do not include Tennessee, Arkansas, and Mississippi.
ANALYSIS
SKILLI
Analyzing Visuals 1.	Do you think the North or the South could maintain better supply lines for their troops? Explain.
2.	Do you think the North or the South could provide more weapons for their troops? Explain.
THE CIVIL WAR 51
Union and Confederate Soldiers
Early in the war, uniforms differed greatly, especially in the Confederate army. Uniforms became simpler and more standard as the war dragged on.
Union Soldier
ANALYSIS
SKILL
Analyzing Visuais How are the Union and Confederate uniforms and equipment similar and different?
Preparing for War
The North and the South now rushed to war. Neither side was prepared for the tragedy to come.
Volunteer Armies
Volunteer militias had sparked the revolution that created the United States. Now they would battle for its future. At the start of the war, the Union army had only 16,(XX) soldiers. Within months that number had swelled to a half million. Southern men rose up to defend their land and their ways of life. Virginian Thomas Webber came to fight "against the invading foe [enemy] who now pollute the sacred soil of my beloved native state." When Union soldiers asked one captured rebel why he was fighting, he replied, "I'm fighting because you're down here."
Helping the Troops
Civilians on both sides helped those in uniform. They raised money, provided aid for soldiers and their families, and ran emergency hospitals. Dr. Elizabeth Black-well, the first woman to receive a license to practice medicine, organized a group that pressured President Lincoln to form the U.S. Sanitary Commission in June 1861. The Sanitary, as it was called, was run by clergyman Henry Bellows. Tens of thousands of volunteers worked with the U.S. Sanitary Commission to send bandages, medicines, and food to Union army camps and hospitals. Some 3,000 women served as nurses in the Union army.
Training the Soldiers
Both the Union and Confederate armies faced shortages of clothing, food, and even rifles. Most troops lacked standard uniforms and simply wore their own clothes. Eventually, each side chose a color for their uniforms. The Union chose blue. The Confederates wore gray.
514 CHAPTER 16
The problem with volunteers was that many of them had no idea how to fight. Schoolteachers, farmers, and laborers all had to learn the combat basics of marching, shooting, and using bayonets.
In a letter to a friend, a Union soldier described life in the training camp.
^We have been wading through mud knee deep all winter... For the last two weeks we have been drilled almost to death. Squad drill from 6 to 7 A.M. Company drill from 9 to 11 A.M. Batal-lion Drill from 2 to 41 /2 P.M. Dress Parade from 5 to 51/2 P.M. and non-commissioned officers' school from 7 to 8 in the evening. If we don't soon become a well drilled Regiment, we ought X.o.^
R. R
Shoemaker,! 862 With visions of glory and action, many young soldiers were eager to fight. They would not have to wait long.
Discipline and drill were used to turn raw volunteers into an efficient fighting machine. During a battle, the success or failure of a regiment often depended on its discipline—how well it responded to orders.
Volunteers also learned how to use rifles. Eventually, soldiers were expected to be able
to load, aim, and fire their rifles three times in one minute. The quality of the weapons provided varied greatly. Most soldiers favored the Springfield and Enfield rifles for their accuracy. On the other hand, soldiers often complained about their Austrian and Belgian rifles. A soldier remarked, "I don't believe one could hit the broadside of a barn with them."
The Union army provided the infantry with two-person tents. However, soldiers often discarded these tents in favor of more portable ones. The Confederate army did not usually issue tents. Instead, Confederates often used tents that were captured from the Union army.
READING CHECK
Summarizing How did soldiers and civilians prepare for war?
SUMMARY AND PREVIEW
Ascitizens chose sides in the Civil War, civilians and soldiers alike became involved in the war effort. In the next section you will learn about some early battles in the war, both on land and at sea. Section 1 Assessment
hmhsocialstudies.com
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
1.	a. Identify What event triggered the war between the Union and the Confederacy?
b.	Explain Who were the presidents of the Union and the Confederacy?
c.	Recall What were the border states? Where were they located?
d.	Contrast How did the Union's strategy differ from that of the Confederacy?
e.	Evaluate Which side do you believe was best prepared for war? How did the physical and human geography affect each side's ability to prepare? Explain your answer.
2.	a. Describe How did women take part in the war?
b.	Summarize In what ways were the armies of the North and South unprepared for war?
c.	Elaborate Why did men volunteer to fight in the war?
Critical Thinking
3. Comparing and Contrasting Review your notes on the preparations for war by the North and the South. Then copy the graphic organizer shown below and use it to show the strengths and weaknesses of each side in the war.
	Union	Confederacy
Strengths		
Weaknesses		
4. Taking Notes on the War's Beginning Take notes on the crisis at Fort Sumter and on the recruiting and training of the armies. Be sure to answer the following questions: Who? Where? When? Why? and How?
THE CIVIL WAR 51
History and Geography
Ideals ot me
North and the SOUth
One of the most basic disagreements that led to the Civil War was whether or not individual states had the legal right to secede. This issue was debated repeatedly . in Congress, state legislatures, the press, and speeches by politicians.The presidents of the two sides, Abraham Lincoln of the Union and Jefferson Davis of the Confederacy, used speeches to explain their governments'goals.
Comparing the Speeches
The speeches of Lincoln and Davis revealed the dramatic difference of opinions between the North and the South. Lincoln spoke of the importance of the Union and the unbreakable bond among states belonging to the government of the United States. Davis's words displayed the view that the idea of states'rights allowed the South to leave the Union because the federal government no longer protected its interests. When Lincoln spoke of liberties and equality, he included those of African Americans. Davis did not touch upon the topics, knowing how divisive the moral issue of slavery was even among Southerners.
f	Ideas	J	Lincoln	1	Davis	|
Liberty	The United States was a nation founded on the belief of liberty for everyone, including African Americans.	The freedom to own slaves was protected under the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution, but had been violated by recent Congressional actions.
Equality	Equality was also guaranteed to everyone by the ideals of the nation.	"Equality" was one of the South's ideals, but did not include equality among races.
Union	The Union was an agreement of many states, and all of them had to agree for it to be broken. Preserving it was his primary goal.	The union of states was based on an agreement, and states could choose to leave if they wanted.
Government	In the form of government under the Constitution, the South should work for an amendment instead of seceding.	Governments rest on the consent of the governed, so states can secede if they disagree with government actions or policies.
December 20,1860
South Carolina secedes from the Union.
November 6,1860
Republican Abraham Lincoln
is elected president.
515a CHAPTER 16
Primary Source
SPEECH
Jefferson Davis's Inaugural Address
j In his inauguration speech, Jefferson Davis gave the reasons Southern leaders 5 believed they had a right to secede, and he stated that they would do so peace-l fully if allowed:
/^[The South's right to secede is based on] the American idea that governments rest on the consent of the governed, and that it is the right of the people to alter or abolish them at will whenever they become destructive of the ends for which they were established.... Actuated solely by the desire to preserve our own. rights, and promote our own welfare, the separation by the Confederate States has been marked by no aggression upon others, and followed by no domestic convulsion1. H

He claimed that the liberties guaranteed to citizens and states in the Declaration of Independence, the U.S. Constitution, and the Bill of Rights had been violated by attempts to limit the spread of slavery. He compared the Constitution of the new government with that of the United States, saying that they were similar. The main difference was the clear protection of slavery in the Confederate constitution.
^/...mutual interest will invite to good will and kind offices on both parts. If,
however, passion or lust of dominion should cloud the judgment or inflame the ambition of those States, we must prepare to meet the emergency and to maintain, by the final arbitrament2 of the sword, the position which we have assumed among the nations of the earth/^
But Davis also spoke of the urgent need for an army and a navy.
Davis'speech only mentions "equality" once, in a list of ideals that he counts as the South's ideals. Davis did not mention equality between the races, even in reference to the lack of equal rights for African Americans. He also did not directly discuss the nature of the Confederate government and union. Even leaders that strongly supported the Confederate cause could not answer whether or not a Southern state would have the rightto secede from the Confederacy if it chose to in the future. The issue would soon become hotly debated in Virginia. Residents of western Virginia wanted to remain part of the Union and seceded from eastern Virginia only a few months after the South's secession. Virginia's legislature fought the action, but the region became the Union state of l/l/esf Virginia the next year.
1. domestic convulsion: internal revolution 2. arbitrament: decision
Davis defended the act of secession as a protection of the rights of slaveholders.
Primary Source

SPEECH

)
w
Lincoln's First Inaugural Address
Lincoln's first inaugural address, on March 4,1861, described his desire to maintain the Union and prevent war with the Southern states. Although slavery was a huge issue in the debate over secession, Lincoln did not say that he would work to free the slaves. He stated that preserving the Union was his primary goal, even if that meant that slavery remained legal.
Lincoln suggested that in a democratic government, the correct course of action for the South was to work toward an amendment to the Constitution instead of rejecting the union. He stated his reasons for disagreeing with Southern leaders on the issue of whether or not secession was legal.
//...no State upon its own mere motion can lawfully get out of the Union [and] that resolves and ordinances to that effect are legally void...//
Lincoln knew that southern leaders had already considered this argument and that some were calling for armed rebellion. They believed the Constitution protected their liberty to own slaves.
//In your hands, my dissatisfied fellow-countrymen, and not in mine, is the momentous issue of civil war. The Government will not assail you. You can have no conflict without being yourselves the aggressors//

He pointed out that because the Union was agreed to by every state, all of them had to agree in order to break it.
Lincoln warned that any revolutionary actions would be met with Union military force.

Primary Source
The first lines are some of the most quoted lines of any American speech. This was the type of nation, one where everyone was entitled to liberty and equality, that the Union troops fought and died for.
He hoped the dedication of the battlefield as a national cemetery would remind northerners of the soldiers'sacrifice.

SPEECH
Gettysburg Address
After the bloody Battle of Gettysburg, Lincoln gave a speech that supported the Union's goal of continuing the fight for the Union.
//Four score and seven years ago our fathers brought forth on this continent, a new nation, conceived in Liberty, and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal//
//[W]e here highly resolve that these dead shall not have died in
vain—that this nation, under God, shall have a new birth of freedom—and that government of the people, by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the earth//
March 4,1861 Abraham Lincoln is inaugurated to his first term.
April 17,1861-May 21,1861 Virginia, Arkansas, Tennessee, and North Carolina secede from the Union.
January 1,1863 The
Emancipation Proclamation goes into effect, freeing slaves in rebelling territories.
November 19,1863
President Lincoln delivers the Gettysburg Address.
515C CHAPTER 16
Primary Source
SPEECH
Lincoln's Second Inaugural Address
By early 1865 the South was near defeat. Lincoln's speech at his second inauguration showed his desire for reconciliation with the South.
He reminded both northerners and southerners that neither side had wanted the war and that each side had taken up arms. Neither side, he implied, was entirely blameless. Lincoln said that the entire country had suffered in the war because it had allowed slavery for so long. He closed his speech with these words:
^With malice toward none, with charity for all, with firmness in the right as God gives us to see the right, let us strive on to finish the work we are in, to bind up the nation's wounds, to care for him who shall have borne the battle and for his widow and his orphan, to do all which may achieve and cherish a just and lasting peace among ourselves and with all nations/*'
——~T
He wanted the entire nation to put the struggle behind it, for-
j give others, and work to repair s the union of states.
ANALYSIS
SKILLS
Analyzing Primary Sources 1.	How were Lincoln's ideas displayed in each of these three speeches?
2.	What ideas were expressed in Davis's inaugural address?
November 8,1864
Lincoln is elected to a second tern.
March 4,1865 President Lincoln
delivers his second inaugural address.
April 9,1865 Lee surrenders to Grant at Appomattox Courthouse, ending the Civil War.
May 5,1865 Davis and his cabinet dissolve the Confederate government.
THE CIVIL WAR 51
What You Will Learn...
Th© lAFair in thi© East

—^OESGElSaB—
1.	Union and Confederate forces fought for control of the war in Virginia.
2.	The Battle of Antietam gave the North a slight advantage.
3.	The Confederacy attempted to break the Union naval blockade.
T
3
If YOU were there...
You live in Washington, D.C., in July 1861. You and your friends are on your way to Manassas, near Washington, to watch the battle there. Everyone expects a quick Union victory. Your wagon is loaded with food for a picnic, and people are in a holiday mood. You see some members of Congress riding toward Manassas, too. Maybe this battle will end the war!
Why would you want to watch this battle?
Confederate and Union forces faced off in Virginia and at sea.
Key Terms and People
Thomas "Stonewall" Jackson, p. 517
First Battle of Bull Run, p. 517 George B. McClellan, p. 517 Robert E. Lee, p. 518 Seven Days' Battles, p. 518 Second Battle of Bull Run, p. 518 Battle of Antietam, p. 519 ironclads, p. 520
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the battles in the East and at sea and the winners of each.
I BUILDING BACKGROUND
The shots fired at Fort Sumter made I the war a reality. Neither the North nor the South was really prepared. Each side had some advantages—more industry and railroads in the ; North, a military tradition in the South. The war in the East centered in i the region around the two capitals: Washington, D.C., and Richmond, j
Virginia.	i
fe---------------------------------------
War in Virginia
The troops that met in the first major battle of the Civil War found that it was no picnic. In July 1861, Lincoln ordered General Irvin McDowell to lead his 35,000-man army from the Union capital, Washington, to the Confederate capital, Richmond. The soldiers were barely trained. McDowell complained that they "stopped every moment to pick blackberries or get water; they would not keep in the ranks." The first day's march covered only five miles.
Bull Run/Manassas
McDowell's army was headed to Manassas, Virginia, an important railroad junction. If McDowell could seize Manassas, he would control the best route to the Confederate capital. Some 22,000 Confederate troops under the command of General Pierre G. T. Beauregard were waiting for McDowell and his troops along a creek called Bull Run. For two days, Union troops tried to find a way around the Confederates. During that time, Beauregard requested assistance, and
516 CHAPTER 16
General Joseph E. Johnston headed toward Manassas with another 10,000 Confederate troops. By July 21,1861, they had all arrived.
That morning, Union troops managed to cross the creek and drive back the left side of the Confederate line. Yet one unit held firmly in place.
"There is Jackson standing like a stone wall!" cried one southern officer. "Rally behind the Virginians!" At that moment, General Thomas "Stonewall" Jackson earned his famous nickname.
A steady stream of Virginia volunteers arrived to counter the attack. The Confederates surged forward, letting out their terrifying "rebel yell." One eyewitness described the awful scene.
^There is smoke, dust, wild talking, shouting; hissings, howlings, explosions. It is a new, strange, unanticipated experience to the soldiers of both armies, far different from what they thought it would be."
—Charles Coffin, quoted in Voices of the Civil War by Richard Wheeler
The battle raged through the day, with rebel soldiers still arriving. Finally, the weary Union troops gave out. They tried to make an orderly retreat back across the creek, but the roads were clogged with the fancy carriages of panicked spectators. The Union army scattered in the chaos.
The Confederates lacked the strength to push north and capture Washington, D.C. But clearly, the rebels had won the day. The First Battle of Bull Run was the first major battle of the Civil War, and the Confederates' victory. The battle is also known as the First Battle of Manassas. It shattered the North's hopes of winning the war quickly.
More Battles in Virginia
The shock at Bull Run persuaded Lincoln of the need for a better trained army. He put his hopes in General George B. McClellan. The general assembled a highly disciplined force of 100,000 soldiers called the Army of the Potomac. The careful McClellan spent months training. However, because
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS! INTERPRETING MAPS
1.	Location Which battle was fought in Maryland?
2.	Human-Environment Interaction How did geography influence the movement of forces?
he overestimated the size of the Confederate army, McClellan hesitated to attack. Lincoln grew impatient. Finally, in the spring of 1862, McClellan launched an effort to capture Richmond called the "Peninsular Campaign." Instead of marching south for a direct assault, McClellan slowly brought his force through the peninsula between the James and York rivers. More time slipped away.
The South feared that McClellan would receive reinforcements from Washington. To prevent this, Stonewall Jackson launched an attack toward Washington. Although the attack was pushed back, it prevented the Union from sending reinforcements to McClellan.
THE IMPACT
TODAY
Many Americans continue to be fascinated by the Civil War. Some history buffs regularly stage re-enactments of famous battles, complete with uniforms, guns, and bayonets.
THE CIVIL WAR 51
In June 1862, with McClellan's force poised outside Richmond, the Confederate army in Virginia came under the command of General Robert E. Lee. A graduate of the U.S. Military Academy at West Point, Lee had served in the Mexican War and had led federal troops at Harpers Ferry. Lee was willing to take risks and make unpredictable moves to throw Union forces off balance.
During the summer of 1862, Lee strengthened his positions. On June 26, he attacked, launching a series of clashes known as the Seven Days' Battles that forced the Union army to retreat from near Richmond. Confederate General D. H. Hill described one failed attack. "It was not war—it was murder," he said. Lee saved Richmond and forced McClellan to retreat.
A frustrated Lincoln ordered General John Pope to march directly on Richmond from Washington. Pope told his soldiers, "Let us look before us and not behind. Success and glory are in the advance."
Jackson wanted to defeat Pope's army before it could join up with McClellan's
larger Army of the Potomac. Jackson's troops met Pope's Union forces on the battlefield in August in 1862. The three-day battle became known as the Second Battle of Bull Run, or the Second Battle of Manassas.
The first day's fighting was savage. Captain George Fairfield of the 7th Wisconsin regiment later recalled, "What a slaughter! No one appeared to know the object of the fight, and there we stood for one hour, the men falling all around." The fighting ended in a stalemate.
On the second day, Pope found Jackson's troops along an unfinished railroad grade. Pope hurled his men against the Confederates. But the attacks were pushed back with heavy casualties on both sides.
On the third day, the Confederates crushed the Union army's assault and forced it to retreat in defeat. The Confederates had won a major victory, and General Robert E. Lee decided it was time to take the war to the North.
Sequencing List in order the
events that forced Union troops out of Virginia.
READING CHECK <
Battle of Antietam
Confederate leaders hoped to follow up Lee's successes in Virginia with a major victory on northern soil. On September 4, 1862, some 40,000 Confederate soldiers began crossing into Maryland. General Robert E. Lee decided to divide his army. He sent about half of his troops, under the command of Stonewall Jackson, to Harpers Ferry. There they defeated a Union force and captured the town. Meanwhile, Lee arrived in the town of Frederick and issued a Proclamation to the People of Maryland, urging them to join the Confederates. However, his words would not be enough to convince Marylanders to abandon the Union. Union soldiers, however, found a copy of Lee's battle plan, which had been left at an abandoned Confederate camp. General McClellan learned that Lee had divided his army in order to attack Harpers Ferry. However, McClellan hesitated to attack. As a result, the Confederates had time to reunite.
I

James Hope was a professional artist who joined the Union army. Too sick to fight at Antietam, Hope was reassigned to work as a scout and a mapmaker. He sketched scenes from the battle as it happened and later used his sketches to make paintings like this one. This scene is of early morning on the battlefield. This painting doesn't represent a particular moment, but is meant to show a series of events.
analysis]
* SKILL! analyzing Visuals
Biography
Robert E. Lee
(1807-1870)
Robert E. Lee was born into a wealthy Virginia family in 1807. Lee fought in the Mexican-American War, helping to capture Veracruz. When the Civil War began, President Lincoln asked Lee to lead the Union army. Lee declined and resigned from the U.S. Army to become a general in the Confederate army.
Drawing Conclusions How did
Lee's choice reflect the division of the states?
The two armies met along Antietam Creek in Maryland on September 17, 1862. The battle lasted for hours. By the end of the day, the Union had suffered more than 12,000 casualties. The Confederates endured more than 13,000 casualties.
Union officer A. H. Nickerson later recalled, "It seemed that everybody near me was killed." The Battle of Antietam, also known as the Battle of Sharpsburg, was the bloodiest single-day battle of the Civil War—and of U.S. history. More soldiers were killed and wounded at the Battle of Antietam than the deaths of all Americans in the American Revolution, War of 1812, and Mexican-American War combined.
During the battle, McClellan kept four divisions of soldiers in reserve and refused to use them to attack Lee's devastated army. McClellan was convinced that Lee was massing reserves for a counterattack. Those reserves did not exist. Despite this blunder, Antietam was an important victory. Lee's northward advance had been stopped.
READING CHECK
Analyzing Why was the Battle of Antietam significant?
How is this painting different from modern war
reporting?
THE CIVIL WAR 5

Primary Source
POLITICAL CARTOON
Anaconda Plan
This cartoon shows visually the North's plan to cut off supplies to the South through naval blockades, a strategy called the Anaconda Plan
How does the cartoonist show x what the snake represents?
ANALYSIS
SKILL]
Why do you think the plan was called the Anaconda Plan?
Why is the snake's head red, white, and blue?
COTTB. CTOCAT
ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES

Breaking the Union's Blockade
While the two armies fought for control of the land, the Union navy controlled the sea. The North had most of the U.S. Navy's small fleet, and many experienced naval officers had remained loyal to the Union. The North also had enough industry to build more ships. The Confederacy turned to British companies for new ships.
Academic
Vocabulary
innovation a new
idea or way of doing something
The Union's Naval Strategy
The Union navy quickly mobilized to set up a blockade of southern ports. The blockade largely prevented the South from selling or receiving goods, and it seriously damaged the southern economy.
The blockade was hard to maintain because the Union navy had to patrol thousands of miles of coastline from Virginia to Texas. The South used small, fast ships to outrun the larger Union warships. Most of these blockade runners traveled to the Bahamas or
Nassau to buy supplies for the Confederacy. These ships, however, could not make up for the South's loss of trade. The Union blockade reduced the number of ships entering southern ports from 6,000 to 800 per year.
Clash of the Ironclads
Hoping to take away the Union's advantage at sea, the Confederacy turned to a new type of warship—irondads, or ships heavily armored with iron. The British government neglected to stop these ships from being delivered, in violation of its pledge of neutrality. The Confederates had captured a Union steamship, the Merrimack, and turned it into an ironclad, renamed the Virginia. One Union sailor described the innovation as "a huge half-submerged crocodile." In early March 1862, the ironclad sailed into Hampton Roads, Virginia, an important waterway guarded by Union ships. Before nightfall, the Virginia easily sank two of the Union's wooden warships, while it received minor damage.
520 CHAPTER 16
GEOGRAPHY ______ ____________
SKILLS 5 INTERPRETING MAPS
Location What major port cities in the South were affected by the blockade?
The Union navy had already built its own ironclad, the Monitor, designed by Swedish-.born engineer John Ericsson. Ericsson's ship had unusual new features, such as a revolving gun tower. One Confederate soldier called the Monitor "a tin can on a shingle!" Although small, the Monitor carried powerful guns and had thick plating.
When the Virginia returned to Hampton Roads later that month, the Monitor was waiting. After several hours of fighting, neither ship was seriously damaged, but the Monitor forced the Virginia to withdraw. This success saved the Union fleet and continued the blockade. The clash of the ironclads also signaled a revolution in naval warfare. The days of wooden warships powered by wind and sails were drawing to a close.
Evaluating How effective
was the Union blockade?
READING CHECK .
I
Summary I ties of the
AND PREVIEW
The early bat-Civil War were centered in the East. In the next section you will read about battles in the West. THE IMPACT
TODAY
The Monitor sank in North Carolina in the winter of 1862. The shipwreck was located by scientists in 1973, and remains of the ship are part of the exhibit at the USS Monitor Center, which opened in 2007.
Section 2 Assessment
hmhsocialstudies.com
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
' 1. a. Identify List the early battles in the East and the outcome of each battle, b. Elaborate Why do you think the Union lost the
t First Battle of Bull Run?
i 2. a. Describe What costly mistake did the Confederacy make before the Battle of Antietam?
b.	Analyze What was the outcome of the Battle of Antietam, and what effect did it have on both the
i North and the South?
c.	Elaborate Why do you think General George B. McClellan did not finish off General Robert E. Lee's troops when he had the chance?
‘ 3. a. Describe What was the Union's strategy in the war at sea?
b. Draw Conclusions Why were ironclads more successful than older, wooden ships?
Critical Thinking
4. Supporting a Point of View Review your notes on the battles in the east and at sea.Then copy the graphic organizer below and use it to show which three conflicts you think were the most significant and why.
Most Significant	Why
	
"’J'WriteSmart
5.	Taking Notes on the War in the East Write notes on the First Battle of Bull Run, the Seven Days' Battles, the Second Battle of Bull Run, and the Battle of Antietam. Be sure to answer the following questions: Who? Where? When? Why? and How?
THE CIVIL WAR 52
What You Will Learn...
The VIFaf m the West
1.	Union strategy in the West centered on control of the Mississippi River.
2.	Confederate and Union troops struggled for dominance in the Far West.
T
The Big Idea
Fighting in the Civil War spread to the western United States.
Key Terms and People
Ulysses S. Grant, p. 522 Battle of Shiloh, p. 523 David Farragut, p. 524 Siege of Vicksburg, p. 524
hmhsocialstudies.com
I TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on Civil War battles in the West.
If YOU were there...
You live in the city of Vicksburg, set on high bluffs above the Mississippi River. Vicksburg is vital to the control of the river, and Confederate defenses are strong. But the Union general is determined to take the town. For weeks, you have been surrounded and besieged. Cannon shells burst overhead, day and night. Some have fallen on nearby homes. Supplies of food are running low.
How would you survive this siege?
I BUILDING BACKGROUND
The Civil War was fought on many fronts, 3 I all across the continent and even at sea. In the East, fighting was atfirst I concentrated in Virginia. In the West, cities and forts along the Mississippi ‘ f River were the main target of Union forces. Northern control of the river ‘ [ would cut off the western states of the Confederacy.	’
—
Union Strategy in the West
While Lincoln fumed over the cautious, hesitant General McClellan, he had no such problems with Ulysses S. Grant. Bold and restless, Grant grew impatient when he was asked to lead defensive maneuvers. He wanted to be on the attack. As a commander of forces in the Union's western campaign, he would get his wish.
The western campaign focused on taking control of the Mississippi River. This strategy would cut off the eastern part of the Confederacy from sources of food production in Arkansas, Louisiana, and Texas. From bases on the Mississippi, the Union army could attack southern communication and transportation networks.
In February 1862, Grant led an assault force into Tennessee. With help from navy gunboats, Grant's Army of the Tennessee took two outposts on key rivers in the west. On February 6, he captured Fort Henry on the Tennessee River. Several days later he took Fort Donelson on the Cumberland River.
Fort Donelson's commander asked for the terms of surrender. Grant replied, "No terms except an unconditional and immediate
522 CHAPTER 16
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS! INTERPRETING MAPS
1.	Location What river did Union forces fight to control?
2.	Human-Environment Interaction Why do you think so many battles took place along rivers?
surrender can be accepted." The fort surrendered. The North gave a new name to Grant's initials: "Unconditional Surrender" Grant.
Advancing south in Tennessee, General Grant paused near Shiloh Church to await the arrival of the Army of the Ohio. Grant knew that the large rebel army of General A. S. Johnston was nearby in Corinth, Mississippi, but he did not expect an attack. Instead of setting up defenses, he worked on drilling his new recruits.
In the early morning of April 6,1862, the rebels sprang on Grant's sleepy camp. This began the Battle of Shiloh, in which the Union army gained greater control of the Mississippi River valley.
During the bloody two-day battle, each side gained and lost ground. Johnston was killed on the first day. The arrival of the Ohio force helped Grant regain territory and push the enemy back into Mississippi. The armies finally gave out, each with about 10,000 casualties. Both sides claimed victory, but, in fact, the victor was Grant.
The Fall of New Orleans
As Grant battled his way down the Mississippi, the Union navy prepared to blast its way upriver to meet him. The first obstacle was the port of New Orleans, the largest city in the Confederacy and the gateway to the Mississippi River.
Biography
David Farragut
(1801-1870)
David Farragut was born in Tennessee to a Spanish father and an American mother. At age seven Farragut was adopted by a family friend who agreed to train the young boy for the navy. Farragut received his first navy position—midshipman at large—at age nine and commanded his first vessel at 12. He spent the rest of his life in the U.S. Navy. Farragut led key attacks on the southern ports of Vicksburg and New Orleans.
Drawing Inferences How did Farragut help the war effort of the North?
THE CIVIL WAR 52
With 18 ships and 700 men, Admiral David Farragut approached the two forts that guarded the entrance to New Orleans from the Gulf of Mexico. Unable to destroy the forts, Farragut decided to race past them.
The risky operation would take place at night. Farragut had his wooden ships wrapped in heavy chains to protect them like ironclads. Sailors slapped Mississippi mud on the ships' hulls to make them hard to see. Trees were tied to the masts to make the ships look like the forested shore.
Before dawn on April 24, 1862, the warships made their daring dash. The Confederates fired at Farragut's ships from the shore and from gunboats. They launched burning rafts, one of which scorched Farragut's own ship. But his fleet slipped by the twin forts and made it to New Orleans. The city fell on April 29.
Farragut sailed up the Mississippi River, taking Baton Rouge, Louisiana, and Natchez, Mississippi. He then approached the city of Vicksburg, Mississippi.
The Siege of Vicksburg
Vicksburg's geography made invasion all but impossible. Perched on 200-foot-high cliffs above the Mississippi River, the city could rain down firepower on enemy ships or on soldiers trying to scale the cliffs. Deep gorges surrounded the city, turning back land assaults. Nevertheless, Farragut ordered Vicksburg to surrender.
^Mississippians don't know, and refuse to learn, how to surrender... If Commodore Farragut... can teach them, let [him] come and try/'
—Colonel James L. Autry, military commander of Vicksburg
Farragut's guns had trouble reaching the city above. It was up to General Grant. His solution was to starve the city into surrender.
General Grant's troops began the Siege of Vicksburg in mid-May 1863, cutting off the city and shelling it repeatedly. As food ran out, residents and soldiers survived by eating horses, dogs, and rats. "We are utterly cut off from the world, surrounded by a circle of fire," wrote one woman. "People do nothing
Primary Source
How does Monroe's statement reveal his attitude about surrender?
but eat what they can get, sleep when they can, and dodge the shells."
The Confederate soldiers were also sick and hungry. In late June a group of soldiers sent their commander a warning.
^The army is now ripe for mutiny [rebellion], unless it can be fed. If you can't feed us, you'd better surrender us, horrible as the idea is/'
—Confederate soldiers at Vicksburg to General John C. Pemberton, 1863
On July 4, Pemberton surrendered. Grant immediately sent food to the soldiers and civilians. He later claimed that "the fate of the Confederacy was sealed when Vicksburg fell."
READING CHECK .
I
Summary I the South
Analyzing What was the importance of the fighting in the Far West?
AND PREVIEW
The North and continued their struggle with battles in the West. A number of key battles took place in the Western theater, and several important Union leaders emerged from these battles. One, Ulysses S. Grant, would soon become even more important to the Union army. In the next section you will learn about the lives of civilians, enslaved Africans, and soldiers during the war.
READING CHECK
Summarizing How did the Union gain control of the Mississippi River?
—	..	_ _	.	hmhsocialstudies.com
Section 3 Assessment S'
Struggle for the Far West
Early on in the war, the Union halted several attempts by Confederate armies to control lands west of the Mississippi. In August 1861, a Union detachment from Colorado turned back a Confederate force at Glorieta Pass. Union volunteers also defeated rebel forces at Arizona's Pichaco Pass.
Confederate attempts to take the border state of Missouri also collapsed. Failing to seize the federal arsenal at St. Louis in mid-1861, the rebels fell back to Pea Ridge in northwest Arkansas. There, in March 1862, they attacked again, aided by some 800 Cherokee. The Indians hoped the Confederates would give them greater freedom. In addition, slavery was legal in Indian Territory, and some Native Americans who were slaveholders supported the Confederacy. Despite being outnumbered, Union forces won the Battle of Pea Ridge. The Union defense of Missouri held.
Pro-Confederate forces remained active in the region throughout the war. They attacked Union forts and raided towns in Missouri and Kansas, forcing Union commanders to keep valuable troops stationed in the area.
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
1.	a. Identify What role did Ulysses S. Grant play in the war in the West?
b.	Explain Why was the Battle of Shiloh important?
c.	Elaborate Do you think President Lincoln would have approved of Grant's actions in the West? Why or why not?
2.	a. Describe How did the Union take New Orleans, and why was it an important victory?
b.	Draw Conclusions How were civilians affected by the Siege of Vicksburg?
c.	Explain What was the significance of the siege at Vicksburg?
d.	Predict What might be some possible results of the Union victory at Vicksburg?
Critical Thinking
3.	Identifying Cause and Effect Review your notes on Union strategy in the West. Then copy this graphic organizer and use it to show the causes and effects of each battle.
i 4. Taking Notes on the War in the West Reread this section i and take notes on the fight for the Mississippi River and the
Siege of Vicksburg. Be sure to answer the following questions: Who? Where? When? Why? and How?
THE CIVIL WAR 5
History and Geography
%l(Sku;,g
the key!"
ncoln declared."Thewar	AMH	■TH	TjW
to a close until that key is	WiM wH Wl «uA JK
Missouri

Arkansas
"Vicksburg is the key!"
President Abraham Lincoln declared. "The war can never be brought to a close until that key is in our pocket." Vicksburg was so important because of its location on the Mississippi River, a vital trade route and supply line. Union ships couldn't get past the Confederate guns mounted on the high bluffs of Vicksburg. Capturing Vicksburg would give the Union control of the Mississippi, stealing a vital supply line and splitting the Confederacy in two. The task fell to General Ulysses S. Grant.






/Mississippi}
Louisiana ..

UNION
CONTROL
CONFEDERATE ; CONTROL

Union ironclads were vital to tf These gunboats protected Grants troi crossed the Mississippi. Later, they fc Vicksburg during the siege of the c

; w £ a <	-..n->
? 7	' , " \	™ ,7	,* ,, 7	‘ *	•	s„< i,	‘	1
7^	** •
„r-
« 7	v	.»■* 4 «$■.■	« > I -,1L
; .-bwl
>,	(f -7 35.7 J* 7-j .->3



IMiMliMTOPIi




ess
The Battle of Jackson Grant defeated a
Confederate army at Jackson and then moved on to Vicksburg. This prevented Confederate forces from reinforcing Vicksburg.
OGRAPHY
Grant Crosses into Louisiana General
Grant planned to attack Vicksburg from the North, but the swampy land made attack from that direction difficult. So, Grant crossed the Mississippi River into Louisiana and marched south.
...77.L - j

• 77 -	'W.

SSI



Ulysses S. Grant
(1822-1885)
Ulysses S. Grant was born in April 1822 in New York. Grant attended West Point and fought in the Mexican-American War. He resigned in 1854 and worked at various jobs in farming, real estate, and retail. When the Civil War started, he joined the Union army and was quickly promoted to general. After the Civil War, Grant rode a wave of popularity to become president of the United States.


Grant Moves East Grant's troops met up with their supply boats here and crossed back into Mississippi. In a daring gamble, Grant decided to move without a supply line, allowing his army to move quickly.
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS! INTERPRETING MAPS
Port Gibson A skirmish
at Pnrt Gih<;nn nrnvpd that
$7 <7^7
1.	Location Why was Vicksburg’s location so important?
2.	Place What natural features made Vicksburg difficult to attack?
Daily Life during t he l^Fair
What You Will Learn...
J
If YOU were there...
1.	The Emancipation Proclamation freed slaves in Confederate states.
2.	African Americans participated in the war in a variety of ways.
3.	President Lincoln faced opposition to the war.
4.	Life was difficult for soldiers and civilians alike.
S—........ -...-.......J
You live in Maryland in 1864. Your father and brothers are in the Union army, and you want to do your part in the war. You hear that a woman in Washington, D.C., is supplying medicines and caring for wounded soldiers on the battlefield. She is looking for volunteers. You know the work will be dangerous, for you'll be in the line of fire. You might be shot or even killed.
Would you join the nurses on the battlefield?
The lives of many Americans were affected by the Civil War.
Key Terms and People
emancipation, p. 529
Emancipation Proclamation, p. 529
contrabands, p. 531
54th Massachusetts Infantry, p. 531
Copperheads, p. 532
habeas corpus, p. 532
Clara Barton, p. 534
----—______------------—
Building Background The civil War touched almost ail Americans. Some 3 million men fought in the two armies. Thousands of other men and women worked behind the lines, providing food, supplies, medical care, and other necessary services. Civilians could not escape the effects of war, as the fighting destroyed farms, homes, and cities.
Emancipation Proclamation
a
hmhsocialstudies.com
TAKING NOTES [
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the effects of the Civil War on the lives of African Americans, soldiers, and women and children.
528 CHAPTER 16
Emancipation Proclamation
At the heart of the nation's bloody struggle were millions of enslaved African Americans. Abolitionists urged President Lincoln to free them.
In an 1858 speech, Lincoln declared,
"There is no reason in the world why the negro is not entitled to all the natural rights numerated in the Declaration of Independence—the right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness." Yet as president, Lincoln found emancipation, or the freeing of slaves, to be a difficult issue. He did not believe he had the constitutional power. He also worried about the effects of emancipation.
Lincoln Issues the Proclamation
Northerners had a range of opinions about abolishing slavery.
•	The Democratic Party, which included many laborers, opposed emancipation. Laborers feared that freed slaves would come north and take their jobs at lower wages.
•	Abolitionists argued that the war was pointless if it did not win freedom for African Americans. They warned that the Union would remain divided until the problem was resolved.
Emancipation Proclamation
1	1	Union state
|	1	Confederate	state
I	1	Border state
K/j Area of legal slaveholding
Area in which slavery was abolished by the Emancipation Proclamation
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS! INTERPRETING MAPS
Place In which places was slavery still legal after the Emancipation Proclamation?
•	Lincoln worried about losing support for the war. Previous wartime Confiscation Acts that had attempted to free the slaves had been unpopular in the border states.
•	Others, including Secretary of War Edwin Stanton, agreed with Lincoln that the use of slave labor was helping the Confederacy make war. Therefore, as commander in chief, the president could free the slaves in all rebellious states. Freed African Americans could then be recruited into the Union army.
For several weeks in 1862, Lincoln worked intensely, thinking, writing, and rewriting. He finally wrote the Emancipation Proclamation, the order to free the Confederate slaves. The proclamation declared that:
M... all persons held as slaves within any State or designated part of a State the people whereof shall then be in rebellion against the United States shall be then, thenceforward, and forever free."
—Emancipation Proclamation, 1862
The Emancipation Proclamation was a military order that freed slaves only in areas controlled by the Confederacy. In fact, the
THE
Cl 529
proclamation had little immediate effect. It was impossible for the federal government to enforce the proclamation in the areas where it actually applied—the states in rebellion that were not under federal control. The proclamation <LJ not stop slavery in the border states, where the federal government would have had the power to enforce it. The words written in the Emancipation Proclamation were powerful, but the impact of the document was more symbolic than real. It defined what the Union was fighting against, and discouraged Britain from aiding the Confederacy.
Lincoln wanted to be in a strong position in the war before announcing his plan. The Battle of Antietam gave him the victory he needed. He issued the Emancipation Proclamation on September 22, 1862. The proclamation went into effect on January 1, 1863.
Reaction to the Proclamation
New Year's Eve, December 31,1862: In "night watch" meetings at many African American churches, worshippers prayed, sang, and gave thanks. When the clocks struck midnight, millions were free. Abolitionists rejoiced. Frederick Douglass called January 1, 1863, "the great day which is to determine the destiny not only of the American Republic, but that of the American Continent."
William Lloyd Garrison was quick to note, however, that "slavery, as a system" continued to exist in the loyal slave states. Yet where slavery remained, the proclamation encouraged many enslaved Africans to escape when the Union troops came near. They flocked to the Union camps and followed them for protection. The loss of slaves crippled the South's ability to wage war.
Finding Main Ideas How did
northerners view the Emancipation Proclamation?
READING CHECK
530 CHAPTER 16
Primary Source
LETTER
June 23,1863
Joseph £ Williams, an African American soldier and recruiter from Pennsylvania, wrote this letter describ ing why African Americans fought for the Union.
“ We (UTe rVOW deter MMUed to kobd every step' wkbed hot been, offered to ws (us ebtbzerus oftke United States for our edevotbon, [benefit], wkbek represent jwstbee, tke purity, tke truth,, Mud respiration, [hope] of keccven,. We m,u,st berern, deeply to recebbree tke duty, tke neorat arcd pobitbeat reecessbty for tke bereefit of our rar-e...Every eon,sbdercetbon, of (wrvor, of interest, Mod of duty to Qod Med nucun,, requires that we skoutd be trwe to our tru,st.”
—quoted in A Grand Army of Black Men, edited by Edwin S. Redkey
SKILL! ANALYZING PRIMARY SOURCES
Why did Williams think being soldiers was so important for African Americans?
African Americans
Participate in the War
As the war casualties climbed, the Union needed even more troops. African Americans were ready to volunteer. Not all white northerners were ready to accept them, but eventually they had to. Frederick Douglass believed that military service would help African Americans gain rights.

Once let the black man get upon his person the brass letters, U.S.; ... and a musket on his shoulder and bullets in his pocket, and there is no power on earth which can deny that he has earned the right to citizenship/^
—Frederick Douglass, quoted in The Life and Writings of Frederick Douglass, Vol. 3
Congress began allowing African Americans to volunteer as laborers in July 1862. The War Department also gave contrabands, or escaped slaves, the right to join the Union army in South Carolina. Free African Americans in Louisiana and Kansas also formed their own units. By the spring of 1863, African American army units were proving themselves in combat. They took part in a Union attack on Port Hudson, Louisiana, in May.
One unit stood out above the others. The 54th Massachusetts Infantry consisted mostly of free African Americans. In July 1863 this regiment led a heroic charge on South Carolina's Fort Wagner. The 54th took heavy fire and suffered huge casualties in the failed operation. About half the regiment was killed, wounded, or captured. Edward L. Pierce, a correspondent for the New York Tribune, wrote, "The Fifty-fourth did well and nobly...They moved up as gallantly as any troops could." William Camey, a sergeant in the regiment, became the first African American to receive the Congressional Medal of Honor after he was shot several times while keeping the U.S. flag aloft during the battle. The bravery of the 54th regiment made it the most celebrated African American unit of the war.
About 180,000 African Americans served with the Union army. They received $10 a month, while white soldiers got $13. They were usually led by white officers, some from abolitionist families.
African Americans faced special horrors on the battlefield. Confederates often killed their black captives or sold them into slavery. In the 1864 election, Lincoln suggested rewarding African American soldiers by giving them the right to vote.
fnWFHnroW Analyzing Information
How did African Americans support the Union?
THECIVILWAR 53’
Growing Opposition
The deepening shadows in Lincoln's face reflected the huge responsibilities he carried. Besides running the war, he had to deal with growing tensions in the North.
Copperheads
As the months rolled on and the number of dead continued to increase, a group of northern Democrats began speaking out against the war. Led by U.S. Representative Clement L. Vallandigham of Ohio, they called themselves Peace Democrats. Their enemies called them Copperheads, comparing them to a poisonous snake. The name stuck.
Many Copperheads were midwest-erners that sympathized with the South and opposed abolition. They believed the war was not necessary and called for its end. Vallandigham asked what the war had gained, and then said, "Let the dead at Fredericksburg and Vicksburg answer."
Lincoln saw the Copperheads as a threat to support of the war effort. To silence them, he suspended the right of habeas corpus.
Habeas corpus is a constitutional protection against unlawful imprisonment. Ignoring this protection, Union officials jailed their enemies, including some Copperheads, without evidence or trial. Lincoln's action greatly angered Democrats and some Republicans.
Northern Draft
In March 1863, war critics erupted again when Congress approved a draft, or forced military service. For $300, men were allowed to buy their way out of military service. For an unskilled laborer, however, that was nearly a year's wages. Critics of the draft called the Civil War a "rich man's war and a poor man's fight."
In July 1863, riots broke out when African Americans were brought into New York City to replace striking Irish dock workers. The city happened to be holding a war draft at the same time. The two events enraged rioters, who attacked African Americans and draft offices. More than 100 people died.
In this tense situation, the northern Democrats nominated former General George McClellan for president in 1864. They called
Infantry Family
While wealthy civilians could avoid military service, poorer men were drafted to serve in the Union army. This member of the 31st Pennsylvania Infantry brought his family along with him. His wife probably helped the soldier with many daily chores such as cooking and laundry.
Why would soldiers bring their families to live with them in camp?
532 CHAPTER 16
*



READING CHECK .
for an immediate end to the war. Lincoln defeated McClellan in the popular vote, winning by about 400,000 votes out of 4 million cast. The electoral vote was not even close. Lincoln won 212 to 21.
Identifying Cause and Effect
Who opposed the war, and how did Lincoln respond to the conflict?
Life for Soldiers and Civilians
Young, fresh recruits in both armies were generally eager to fight. Experienced troops, however, knew better.
On the Battlefield
Civil War armies fought in the ancient battlefield formation that produced massive casualties. Endless rows of troops fired directly at one another, with cannonballs landing amid them. When the order was given, soldiers would attach bayonets to their guns and rush toward their enemy. Men died to gain every inch of ground.
Doctors and nurses in the field saved many lives. Yet they had no medicines to stop infections that developed after soldiers were wounded. Many soldiers endured the horror of having infected legs and arms amputated without painkillers. Infections from minor injuries caused many deaths.
Despite the huge battlefield losses, the biggest killer in the Civil War was not the fighting. It was diseases such as typhoid, pneumonia, and tuberculosis. Nearly twice as many soldiers died of illnesses as died in combat.
Prisoners of War
Military prisoners on both sides lived in unimaginable misery. In prison camps, such as Andersonville, Georgia, and Elmira, New York, soldiers were packed into camps designed to hold only a fraction of their number. Soldiers had little shelter, food, or clothing. Starvation and disease killed thousands of prisoners.
Linking to jqday
Modern battlefield communications
ANALYSIS
SKILL! ANALYZING INFORMATION
Battlefield Communications
The drummer was an essential member of every Civil War unit. Drummers served army commanders by drumming specific beats that directed troop movements during battle. Different beats were used to order troops to prepare to attack, to fire, to cease fire, and to signal a truce. Drummers had to stay near their commanders to hear orders. This meant that the drummers—some as young as nine years old—often saw deadly combat conditions.
The Civil War gave birth to the Signal Corps, the army unit devoted to communications. Today battlefield communications are primarily electronic. Radio, e-mail, facsimile, and telephone messages, often relayed by satellites, enable orders and other information to be transmitted nearly instantaneously all over the globe.
Drum Corps of 61 st New York Infantry
Why is communication so important on the battlefield?
THE CIVIL WAR 53
THE IMPACT
TODAY
Providing assistance to victims of war is still part of the American Red
Cross's mission today. In addition, the American
Red Cross aids victims of natural disasters, provides services to the needy, supports military members and their families, and collects and distributes lifesaving blood.
Life as a Civilian
The war effort involved all levels of society. Women as well as people too young i or too old for military service worked in factories and on farms. Economy in the North boomed as production and prices soared. The
lack of workers caused wages to rise by 43 percent between 1860 and 1865.
Women were the backbone of civilian life. On the farms, women and children performed the daily chores usually done by men. One visitor to Iowa in 1862 reported that he "met more women ... at work in the fields than men." Southern women also managed farms and plantations.
One woman brought strength and comfort to countless wounded Union soldiers. Volunteer Clara Barton organized the collection of medicine and supplies for delivery to the battlefield. At the field hospitals,
Clara Barton
founded the American Red Cross.
the "angel of the battlefield" soothed the wounded and dying and assisted doctors as bullets flew around her. Barton's work formed the basis for the future American Red Cross. In the South, Sally Louisa
Tompkins established a small hospital in Richmond, Virginia. By the end of the war, it had grown into a major army hospital. Jefferson Davis recognized her value to the war effort by making her a captain in the Confederate army.
READING CHECK
Analyzing How did women help the war effort on both sides?
I SUMMARY AND PREVIEW
Many lives I were changed by the war. In the next section you will learn about the end of the war.
Section 4 Assessment

hmhsocialstudies.com
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
1.	a. Recall Why did some Americans want to end slavery?
b.	Contrast How did reactions to the Emancipation Proclamation differ?
c.	Elaborate Do you think that the emancipation of slaves should have extended to the border states? Explain your answer.
2.	a. Recall Why did some northerners want to recruit African Americans into the Union army?
b. Contrast In what ways did African American soldiers face more difficulties than white soldiers did?
3.	a. Identify Who were Copperheads, and why did they oppose the war?
b. Evaluate Should President Lincoln have suspended the right to habeas corpus? Why?
4.	a. Describe What were conditions like in military camps?
b. Draw Conclusions How did the war change life
on the home front?
Critical Thinking
5. Identifying Effects Review your notes. Then copy the graphic organizer below. Use it to summarize the reasons for the Emancipation Proclamation, its main points, and its effects on different people.
6. Taking Notes on Life During the War Take notes on the emancipation of the slaves, African American soldiers, and women who provided medical care for soldiers. Answer the following questions: Who? Where? When? Why? and How?
534 CHAPTER 16
IOGRAPHYi
Abraham Li
What would you do to save the
struggling Union?
When did he live? 1809-1865
Where did he live? Abraham Lincoln was bom in a log cabin to a poor family in Kentucky. Growing up in Kentucky and Illinois, Lincoln went to school for less than a year. He taught himself law and settled in Springfield, where he practiced law and politics. As president he lived in Washington, D.C. There, at age 56, his life was cut short by an assassin, John Wilkes Booth.
1834 Elected to the I nois legislature 1842 Marries Mary Todd
1858 Holds series of famous debates with U.S. Senator Stephen Douglas
4 1860 Elected president on November 6
1863 Issues the Emancipation Proclamation on January 1
1863 Gives the Gettysburg Address on November 19
4 1865 Gives second inaugural address on March 4
4 1865 Shot on April 14; dies the next day
The issue of slavery defined Lincoln's political career. He was not an abolitionist, but he strongly opposed extending slavery into the territories. In a series of famous debates against Senator Stephen Douglas of Illinois, Lincoln championed his views on slavery and made a brilliant defense of democracy and the Union. As president, Lincoln led the nation through the Civil War.
Why is he important? Lincoln is one of the great symbols of American democracy. "A house divided against itself cannot stand," he declared in a debate with Douglas. In 1863 Lincoln issued the Emancipation Proclamation. His address to commemorate the
bloody battlefield at Gettysburg is widely considered to be one of the best political speeches in American history.
Summarizing Why is Lincoln such an important figure in American history?
What did he do?
Lincoln's address at the dedication of the Gettysburg National Cemetery.
What You Will Learn...
The Tide of War Turns
■ WO ■ ■ B'IBf
If YOU were there...
1.	The Union tried to divide the Confederate Army at Fredericksburg, but the attempt failed.
2.	The Battle of Gettysburg in 1863 was a major turning point in the war.
3.	During 1864, Union campaigns in the East and South dealt crippling blows to the Confederacy.
4.	Union troops forced the South to surrender in 1865, ending the Civil War.
........ .....................<<
You live in southern Pennsylvania in 1863, near a battlefield where thousands died. Now people have come from miles around to dedicate a cemetery here. You are near the front of the crowd. The first speaker impresses everyone with two hours of dramatic words and gestures. Then President Lincoln speaks—just a few minutes of simple words. Many people are disappointed.
Why do you think the president’s speech was so short?
^ The Big
Union victories in 1863,1864, and 1865 ended the Civil War.
I BUILDING BACKGROUND
Many people, especially in the North, I had expected a quick victory, but the war dragged on for years. The bal-1 ance of victories seemed to seesaw between North and South, and both
sides suffered terrible casualties. The last Confederate push into the North ended at Gettysburg in one of the bloodiest battles of the war.
Key Terms and People
Battle of Gettysburg, p. 537 George Pickett, p. 539 Pickett's Charge, p. 539 Gettysburg Address, p. 540 Wilderness Campaign, p. 540 William Tecumseh Sherman, p. 541 total war, p. 542 Appomattox Courthouse, p. 542
hmhsocialstudies.com
W" TAKING NOTES
Use the graphic organizer online to take notes on the events that led to the end of the Civil War.
Fredericksburg and Chancellorsville
Frustrated by McClellan's lack of aggression, Lincoln replaced him with General Ambrose E. Burnside as leader of the Army of the Potomac. Burnside favored a swift, decisive attack on Richmond by way of Fredericksburg. In November 1862, he set out with 120,000 troops.
Burnside's tactics surprised General Lee. The Confederate commander had divided his force of 78,000 men. Neither section of the Confederate army was in a good position to defend Fredericksburg. However, Burnside's army experienced delays in crossing the Rappahannock River. These delays allowed Lee's army to reunite and entrench themselves around Fredericksburg. Finally, the Union army crossed the Rappahannock and launched a series of charges. These attacks had heavy casualties and failed to break the Confederate line. Eventually, after suffering about 12,600 casualties, Burnside ordered a retreat. The Confederates had about 5,300 casualties.
Soon Burnside stepped down from his position. Lincoln made General Joseph Hooker the commander of the Army of the Potomac. At the end of April 1863, Hooker and his army of about 138,000 men launched a frontal attack on Fredericksburg. Then Hooker
536 CHAPTER 16
ordered about 115,000 of his troops to split off and approach the Confederate's flank, or side. Hooker's strategy seemed about to work. But for some reason he hesitated and had his flanking troops take a defensive position at Chancellorsville. This town was located a few miles west of Fredericksburg.
The following day, Lee used most of his army (about 60,000 men) to attack Hooker's troops at Chancellorsville. Stonewall Jack-son led an attack on Hooker's flank while Lee commanded an assault on the Union front. The Union army was almost cut in two. They managed to form a defensive line, which they held for three days. Then Hooker ordered a retreat.
Lee's army won a major victory. But this victory had severe casualties. During the battle, Lee's trusted general, Stonewall Jackson, was accidentally shot by his own troops. He died a few days later.
Comparing What did
generals McClellan, Burnside, and Hooker have in common?
READING CHECK
Battle of Gettysburg
General Lee launched more attacks within Union territory. As before, his goal was to break the North's will to fight. He also hoped that a victory would convince other nations to recognize the Confederacy.
First Day
In early June 1863, Lee cut across northern Maryland into southern Pennsylvania. His forces gathered west of a small town called Gettysburg. Lee was unaware that Union soldiers were encamped closer to town. He had been suffering from lack of enemy information for three days because his cavalry chief "Jeb" Stuart was not performing his duties. Stuart and his cavalry had gone off on their own raiding party, disobeying Lee's orders.
Another Confederate raiding party went to Gettysburg for boots and other supplies. There, Lee's troops ran right into Union general George G. Meade's cavalry, triggering the Battle of Gettysburg, a key battle that finally turned the tide against the Confederates. The battle began on July 1, 1863, when the
Three Days at Gettysburg
Gettysburg was the largest and bloodiest battle of the Civil War.
In three days, more than 51,000 soldiers were killed, wounded, captured, or went missing. It was an important victory for the Union, and it stopped Lee's plan of invading the North.

Confederate raiding party and the Union forces began exchanging fire. The larger Confederate forces began to push the Union troops back through Gettysburg.
The Union soldiers regrouped along the high ground of Cemetery Ridge and Culp's Hill. General Lee wanted to prevent the Union forces from entrenching themselves. He therefore ordered General Ewell to attack immediately. However, Ewell hesitated and thereby gave the Federals time to establish an excellent defensive position.
In fact, Confederate General James Longstreet thought that the Union position was almost impossible to overrun. Instead of attacking, he felt that the Confederate army should move east, take a strong defensive position themselves, and wait for the Union forces to attack them. However, General Lee was not convinced. He believed that his troops were invincible.
The Confederates camped at Seminary Ridge, which ran parallel to the Union forces. Both camps called for their main forces to reinforce them and prepare for combat the next day.
Second Day
On July 2, Lee ordered an attack on the left side of the Union line. Lee knew that he could win the battle if his troops captured Little Round Top from the Union forces. From this hill, Lee's troops could easily fire down on the line of Union forces. Union forces and Confederate troops fought viciously for control of Little Round Top. The fighting was particularly fierce on the south side of the hill. There the 20th Maine led by Colonel Joshua Chamberlain battled the 15th Alabama led by Colonel William Oates. Later, when describing the conflict, Oates said, "The blood stood in puddles in some places in the rocks." Eventually, the Union forced the Confederates to pull back from Little Round Top.
Then the Confederates attacked Cemetery Hill and Culp's Hill. The fighting lasted until nightfall. The assault on Cemetery Hill was unsuccessful. The Confederates did manage to take a few trenches on Culp's Hill. Even so, the Union forces still held a strong defensive position by the day's end.

I ! inRlim H RNRIHII
538 CHAPTER 16
Pickett's Charge
On the third day of battle, Longstreet again tried to convince Lee not to attack. But Lee thought that the Union forces were severely battered and ready to break. Because of this, he planned to attack the center of the Union line on Cemetery Ridge. Such a tactic, he felt, would not be expected. Indeed, General Meade left only about 5,750 troops to defend the center.
For over an hour, the Confederates shelled Cemetery Ridge with cannon fire. For a while, the Union cannons fired back. Then they slacked off. The Confederates assumed that they had seriously damaged the Union artillery. In reality, the Confederate barrage did little damage.
The task of charging the Union center fell to three divisions of Confederate soldiers. General George Pickett commanded the largest unit. In late afternoon, nearly 15,000 men took part in Pickett's Charge. For one mile, the Confederates marched slowly up toward Cemetery Ridge. Showered with cannon and rifle fire, they suffered severe losses. But eventually, some of them almost reached their destination. Then Union reinforcements added to the barrage on the rebels. Soon the
/I
sd
Pickett's Charge, July 3,1863
General George Pickett led his troops across Emmitsburg Road to attack the Union position. He lost more than half of his men in the 50-minute battle.
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS]
Interpreting Maps } 1.	Human-Environment Interaction How do you think geography affected Pickett's Charge?
2.	Movement In which direction did Pickett's soldiers charge?



Pickett's Charge
Pickett's Charge proved a disaster for the Confederate attackers. Fewer than half of them survived.
Day Three: July 3,1863,3 p.m. j
lilE CIVIL WAR 5?
FOCUS ON
Reaping Summarize the effects of the Battle of Gettysburg. All
HISTORY
VIDEO
Gettysburg
Address
71 hmhsocialstudies.com
Academic
Vocabulary
execute to
perform, carry out
Confederates retreated, leaving about 7,500 casualties on the field of battle. Distressed by this defeat, General Lee rode among the survivors and told them, "It is all my fault."
On the fourth day, Lee began to retreat to Virginia. In all, nearly 75,000 Confederate soldiers and 90,000 Union troops had fought during the Battle of Gettysburg.
General Meade decided not to follow Lee's army. This decision angered Lincoln. He felt that Meade had missed an opportunity to crush the Confederates and possibly end the war.
Aftermath of Gettysburg
Gettysburg was a turning point in the war. Lee's troops would never again launch an attack in the North. The Union victory at Gettysburg took place on the day before Grant's capture of Vicksburg, Mississippi. These victories made northerners believe that the war could be won.
In addition, the Union win at Gettysburg helped to end the South's search for foreign influence in the war. After Gettysburg, Great Britain and France refused to provide aid to the Confederacy. The South's attempt at cotton diplomacy failed.
The Gettysburg Address
On November 19, 1863, at the dedicating ceremony of the Gettysburg battlefield cemetery, President Lincoln gave a speech called the Gettysburg Address, in which he praised the bravery of Union soldiers and renewed his commitment to winning the Civil War. This short but moving speech is one of the most famous in American history. In one of its frequently quoted lines, Lincoln referenced the Declaration of Independence and its ideals of liberty, equality, and democracy. He reminded listeners that the war was being fought for those reasons.
Lincoln rededicated himself to winning the war and preserving the Union. A difficult road still lay ahead.
Analyzing Why was
Gettysburg a turning point?
READING CHECK
Union Campaigns Cripple the Confederacy
Lincoln had been impressed with General Grant's successes in capturing Vicksburg. He transferred Grant to the East and gave him command of the Union army. In early 1864, Grant forced Lee to fight a series of battles in Virginia that stretched Confederate soldiers and supplies to their limits.
Wilderness Campaign in the East
From May through June, the armies fought in northern and central Virginia. Union troops launched the Wilderness Campaign—a series of battles designed to capture the Confederate capital at Richmond, Virginia. The first battle took place in early May, in woods about 50 miles outside of Richmond. Grant then ordered General Meade to Spotsylvania, where the fighting raged for five days.
Over the next month, Union soldiers moved the Confederate troops back toward Richmond. However, Grant experienced his worst defeat at the Battle of Cold Harbor in early June, just 10 miles northeast of Richmond. In only a few hours the Union army suffered 7,000 casualties. The battle delayed Grant's plans to take the Confederate capital.
Union forces had suffered twice as many casualties as the Confederates had, yet Grant continued his strategy. He knew he would be getting additional soldiers, and Lee could not. Grant slowly but surely advanced his troops through Virginia. He told another officer, "I propose to fight it out on this line if it takes all summer."
After Cold Harbor, General Grant moved south of Richmond. He had hoped to take control of the key railroad junction at Petersburg, Virginia. Lee's army, however, formed a solid defense, and Grant could not execute his attack. Grant was winning the war, but he still had not captured Richmond. Facing re-election, Lincoln was especially discouraged by this failure.
540 CHAPTER 16
1	1 Union state
P ,] Union occupied, 1865
Union forces Union victory Confederate forces if Confederate victory 0	100	200 Miles
I ——•
100	200 Kilometers
GEOGRAPHY
SKILLS INTERPRETING MAPS
1.	Movement About how long was Sherman's March to the Sea from Atlanta to Savannah?
2.	Movement What challenges do you think Sherman faced on his southern attacks?
Sherman Strikes the South
Lincoln needed a victory for the Union army to help him win re-election in 1864. The bold campaign of General William Tecumseh Sherman provided this key victory. Sherman carried out the Union plan to destroy southern railroads and industries.
In the spring of 1864, Sherman marched south from Tennessee with 100,000 troops. His goal was to take Atlanta, Georgia, and knock out an important railroad link. From May through August, Sherman's army moved steadily through the Appalachian Mountains toward Atlanta. Several times, Sherman avoided defenses set up by Confederate general Joseph Johnston.
In July, Sherman was within sight of
Atlanta. Confederate president Jefferson
Davis gave General John Hood command of
Confederate forces in the region. Hood repeat-
edly attacked Sherman in a final attempt to
save Atlanta, but the Union troops proved stronger. The Confederate troops retreated as Sherman held Atlanta under siege.
Atlanta fell to Sherman's troops on September 2, 1864. Much of the city was destroyed by artillery and fire. Sherman ordered the residents who still remained to leave. Responding to his critics, Sherman later wrote, "War is war, and not popularityseeking." The loss of Atlanta cost the South an important railroad link and its center of industry.
Many people in the North had been upset with the length of the war. However, the capture of Atlanta showed that progress was being made in defeating the South. This success helped to convince Union voters to re-elect Lincoln in a landslide.
Sherman did not wait long to begin his next campaign. His goal was the port city of Savannah, Georgia. In mid-November 1864,
THE CIVIL WAR 5'
Sherman left Atlanta with a force of about 60,000 men. He said he would "make Georgia howl!"
During his March to the Sea, Sherman practiced total war — destroying civilian and economic resources. Sherman believed that total war would ruin the South's economy and its ability to fight. He ordered his troops to destroy railways, bridges, crops, livestock, and other resources. They burned plantations and freed slaves. The destruction of the South's crops and fields would be felt economically for years after the war.
Sherman's army reached Savannah on December 10,1864. They left behind a path of destruction 60 miles wide. Sherman believed that this march would speed the end of the war. He wanted to break the South's will to fight by marching Union troops through the heart of the Confederacy. In the end, Sherman's destruction of the South led to anger and resentment toward the people of the North that would last for generations.
READING CHECK
Drawing Conclusions
How did Sherman hope to help the Union with his total-war strategy?
Causes and Effects of the Civil War
tier's
L
Causes
•	Disagreement over the institution of slavery
•	Economic differences Political differences
Effects
•	Slavery ends
•	620,000 Americans killed
•	Military districts created
•	Southern economy in ruins

ANALYSIS
SKILL! INTERPRETING CHARTS
The South Surrenders
In early January 1865, the Union navy took control of the port at Wilmington, North Carolina, the last major port available to the Confederates. During the height of the battle, six Navy crewmen entered the fort as it was being shelled in order to deliver messages to the commander. The men, including Chilean immigrant Philip Bazaar, were awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor for their valor in this duty. Then in early April, Sherman closed in on the last Confederate defenders in North Carolina. At the same time, Grant finally broke through the Confederate defenses at Petersburg. On April 2, Lee was forced to retreat from Richmond.
Fighting Ends
By the second week of April 1865, Grant had surrounded Lee's army and demanded the soldiers' surrender. Lee hoped to join other Confederates in fighting in North Carolina, but Grant cut off his escape just west of Richmond. Lee tried some last minute attacks but could not break the Union line. Lee's forces were running low on supplies. General James Longstreet told about the condition of Confederate troops. "Many weary soldiers were picked up ... some with, many without, arms [weapons],—all asking for food."
Trapped by the Union army, Lee recognized that the situation was hopeless. "There is nothing left for me to do but go and see General Grant," Lee said, "and I would rather die a thousand deaths."
On April 9, 1865, Union and Confederate leaders met in the small town of Appomattox Courthouse where Lee surrendered to Grant, thus ending the Civil War.
During the meeting, Grant assured Lee that his troops would be fed and allowed to keep their horses, and they would not be tried for treason. Then Lee signed the surrender documents. The long, bloody war had finally ended. Grant later wrote that he found the scene at Appomattox Courthouse more tragic than joyful.
How important was slavery to the Civil War?
542 CHAPTER 16
Union genera! Grant rose to shake hands with Confederate general Lee after the surrender. Grant allowed Lee to keep his sword and Lee's men to keep their horses.
M/ias it important for Grant and Lee to shake hands? Why or why not?
** I felt. . . sad and depressed at the downfall of a foe [enemy] who had fought so long and valiantly [bravely], and had suffered so much for a cause, though that cause was, I believe, one of the worst for which a people ever fought/^
I hmhsocialstudies.com
S.
Grant, Battle Cry of Freedom As General Lee returned to his troops, General Grant stopped Union forces from cheering their victory. "The war is over," Grant said with relief. "The rebels are our countrymen again."
The Effects of the War
The Civil War lasted four years, from 1861 to 1865, and had deep and long-lasting effects. Almost 620,000 Americans lost their lives during the four years of fighting.
The defeat of the South ended slavery there. The majority of former slaves, however, had no homes or jobs. The southern economy was in ruins.
A tremendous amount of hostility remained, even after the fighting had ceased. The war was over, but the question remained: How could the United States be united once more?
Section 5 Assessment
Reviewing Ideas, Terms, and People
1.	a. Identify What Confederate general died from his wounds at Chancellorsville?
b. Draw Conclusions Why was the Union army defeated at Chancellorsville?
2.	a. Identify What was the Gettysburg Address?
b. Analyze Why was geography important to the outcome of the Battle of Gettysburg? Why was the battle significant?
3.	a. Recall What was the purpose of the Wilderness Campaign?
b. Draw Conclusions In what way was the capture of Atlanta an important victory for President Lincoln?
4.	a. Identify What events led to Lee's surrender at Appomattox Courthouse?
b. Summarize What problems did the South face at the end of the war?
READING CHECK
Predicting What problems might the Union face following the Civil War?
I
Summary and Preview After four long I years, the Civil War ended with General Critical Thinking
5. Supporting a Point of View Review your notes on the end of the Civil War. Then copy the graphic organizer below. Use it to show the three events in
this section that you think contributed most to the end of the Civil War and explain why.
s on Writing
6. Taking Notes on the End of the War Reread this section and take notes on the Battle of Gettysburg, the Wilderness Campaign, the fall of Atlanta, and the South's surrender. Be sure to answer the following questions: Who? Where? When? Why? and How?
Lee's surrender at Appomattox Court-
house. In the next chapter you will read
about the consequences of the war in the
South.
THE CIVIL WAR 5'
Social Studies Skills
Analysis
Critical
Thinking
Interpreting Political Cartoons
[ Define the Skill J
Political cartoons are drawings that express views on important issues. They have been used throughout history to influence public opinion. The ability to interpret political cartoons will help you understand issues and people's attitudes about them.
Learn the Skill
Political cartoons use both words and images to convey their message. They often contain caricatures or symbolism. A caricature is a drawing that exaggerates the features of a person or object. Symbolism is the use of one thing to represent something else. Cartoonists use these techniques to help make their point clear. They also use titles, labels, and captions to get their message across.
Use these steps to interpret political cartoons.
1.	Read any title, labels, and caption to identify the cartoon's general topic.
2.	Identify the people and objects. Determine if they are exaggerated and, if so, why. Identify any symbols and analyze their meaning.
3.	Draw conclusions about the message the cartoonist is trying to convey.
The following cartoon was published in the
North in 1863. The cartoonist has used symbols to make his point. Lady Liberty, representing the Union, is being threatened by the Copperheads. The cartoonist has expressed his opinion of these people by drawing them as the poisonous snake for which they were named. This cartoon clearly supports the Union's continuing to fight the war.
Practice the Skill
Apply the guidelines to interpret the cartoon below and answer the questions that follow.
1.	What do the two men on either side of Lincoln represent?
2.	What message do you think the artist was trying to convey?
LINCOLN’S TWO DIFFICULTIES.
NO
MtWTi 544 CHAPTER 16
CHAPTER
Chapter Review
Visual Summary
Use the visual summary below to help you review the main ideas of the chapter.
Reviewing Vocabulary, Terms, and People
Match the numbered definitions with the correct terms from the list below.
a.	contrabands
b.	cotton diplomacy
c.	Second Battle of Bull Run
d.	Siege of Vicksburg
e.	Thomas "Stonewall" Jackson
1.	Attack by Union general Ulysses S. Grant that gave the North control of the Mississippi River
2.	Confederate general who held off Union attacks and helped the South win the First Battle of Bull Run
3.	Important Confederate victory in which General Robert E. Lee defeated Union troops and pushed into Union territory for the first time
4.	Southern strategy of using cotton exports to gain Britain's support in the Civil War
5.	Term given to escaped slaves from the South
Comprehension and
Critical Thinking
SECTION 1 (Pages 510-515)
6.	a. Identify When and where
did fighting in the U.S. Civil War begin?
b.	Analyze How did civilians help the war effort in both the North and the South?
c.	Elaborate Why do you think the border states chose to remain in the Union despite their support of slavery?
SECTION 2 (Pages 516-521)
7.	a. Identify What was the first major battle of the war? What was the outcome of the battle?
b.	Analyze What was the Union army hoping to accomplish when it marched into Virginia at the start of the war? What was General Lee's role in the battles? What was Stonewall Jackson's role?
c.	Evaluate Was the Union's naval blockade of the South successful? Why or why not?
THE CIVIL WAR 54
SECTION 3 (Pages 522-525)
8.	a. Identify Which side did the Cherokee support in the fighting at Pea Ridge? Why?
b.	Draw Conclusions What progress did Union leaders make in the war in the West?
c.	Evaluate Which victory in the West was most valuable to the Union? Why?
SECTION 4 (Pages 528-534)
9.	a. Describe What responsibilities did women take on during the war?
b.	Analyze What opposition to the war did President Lincoln face, and how did he deal with that opposition?
c.	Predict What might be some possible problems that the newly freed slaves in the South might face?
SECTION 5 (Pages 536-543)
10.	a. Recall When and where did the war finally end? Which general represented each side at the signing of the treaty?
b.	Compare and Contrast How were the efforts of Generals Grant and Sherman at the end of the war similar and different?
c.	Elaborate What do you think led to the South's defeat in the Civil War? Explain.
Social Studies Skills
Interpreting Political Cartoons Use the Social Studies Skills taught in this chapter to answer the question about the political cartoon below.
12.	Find a modern political cartoon and interpret it.
Reading Skills
Summarizing Use the Reading Skills taught in this chapter to answer the question below.
13.	Write a summary of Abraham Lincoln's ideas about liberty, equality, union, and government as found in his first and second inaugural addresses and the Gettysburg Address. Then compare and contrast his ideas with the ideas found in Jefferson Davis's inaugural address. Summarize how the differences in ideas reflected the political conflicts between the sections.
Reviewing Themes
14.	Society and Culture When was the Civil War? What were its causes, and what were its effects on American society?
15.	Politics What political difficulties did the Emancipation Proclamation cause for President Lincoln?
16.	Politics Choose three heroes mentioned in the chapter and write three sentences explaining the significance of each. Then choose two of the following and write three sentences explaining their significance: Fort Sumter, Antietam, Gettysburg, Vicksburg, Emancipation Proclamation, or Appomattox Court House.
Using the Internet
17.	Activity: Writing a Poem Soldiers in the Civil War came from all walks of life. Despite hoping for glory and adventure, many encountered dangerous and uncomfortable conditions. Through your online textbook, learn more about Civil War soldiers. After viewing photographs and reading letters, write a poem describing the life of a soldier. Your poem should reflect on the soldier's emotions and experiences.
71 hmhsocialstudies.coml
myWriteSmart
18. Write Your Newspaper Article Review your notes. Then choose the subject you think would make the best newspaper article. Write an attention-grabbing headline. Then write your article, giving as many facts as possible.
546 CHAPTER 16
11. What do you think the artist is saying about
politicians with this cartoon?
Texas Test Practice
DIRECTIONS:
Read each question and write the letter of the best response. 1	Use the map below to answer the following question.
The place where two major battles of the Civil War were fought is indicated on the map by which letter?
A W B X C Y D Z
2	The Battle of Gettysburg was an important battle of the Civil War because
F it was an overwhelming Confederate victory.
G the Union army’s advance on the Confederate capital was stopped.
H it ended Lee’s hopes of advancing into northern territory.
J it enabled the Union to control the Mississippi River.
3	Overall command of Confederate forces in Virginia during most of the Civil War was held by
A
Jefferson Davis. B
William Tecumseh Sherman. C
Thomas “Stonewall” Jackson. D
Robert E. Lee. 4	Which of Lincoln’s speeches and writings reflected the statement that “all men are created equal”?
F the Emancipation Proclamation G the first inaugural address (1861)
H the second inaugural address (1865)
J the Gettysburg Address
5	The tactics that Sherman used against Confederate armies in the South were based on what strategy?
A cutting off troops from their officers B a naval blockade of southern ports C destroying the South’s resources and economy D hit-and-run attacks on major southern cities
6	In the War of 1812 the British navy blockaded American seaports in the hope that the U.S. economy would suffer and the United States would surrender. Which Civil War strategy was similar?
F
Scott’s plan to destroy the southern economy G Sherman’s March to the Sea H General Ulysses S. Grant’s capture of Vicksburg J Admiral David Farragut’s defeat of New Orleans 7	Read the following quote from Grant about Lee’s surrender and use it to answer the question below.
zzWhat General Lee’s feelings were I do not know. He was a man of much dignity, without expression on his face. It was impossible to say whether he felt inwardly glad that the end had finally come, or felt sad over the result, and was too manly to show it. Whatever his feelings, they were entirely hidden from me.
S.
Grant, adapted from Personal Memoirs of U.S. Grant, Vol. 2 Document-Based Question What is your opinion about what Lee might have been feeling during his surrender?
THE CIVIL WAR 54i
MULTIMEDIA CONNECTIONS
CLICK THROUGH
HISTORY
7 AW	reached the front Izw, when, on loohtng
sy the street, I saw some o^the men on horsehaek... Whata, horrible sight!...
I woe fully persuaded, that the KoMa had aetuedly come at lust, Whatthey would do with us wus a fearful afoestlon to my young mind ,. .”
..Tiilie Pierce, aee 15
INTER ACTIVITIES
hmhsocialstudies.com



ft A Young Woman's Account
Read the document to witness the arrival of Confederate troops through the eyes of a Gettysburg teenager.
jliilO
h A Citizen-Soldier
Watch the video to meet John Burns, the man who would come to be called the "Citizen Hero of Gettysburg."

r.w
,al
M'
SL i
Bill#
■
-'■W'J £
nr.
1*1*"




A
Family's Story Watch the video to discover the story of courage and commitment exhibited by one Gettysburg family.
'A

Gettysburg, Pennsylvania, was a sleepy agricultural town of about 2,400 residents when the Civil War arrived on its doorstep in the early summer of 1863. Many of the town's men were elsewhere, either fighting in the war or guarding their livestock in the countryside. This left mostly women and children to endure the battle. For three terrifying days they hid in basements or in
tightly shuttered houses. Even after the battle finally ended the horrors continued, as the Gettysburg civilians emerged to find a scene of unimaginable death and destruction.
Explore some of the personal stories and recollections of the Gettysburg civilians online. You can find a wealth of information, video clips, primary sources, activities, and more at f
71 hmhsocialstudies.com

1 The National Cemetery
Watch the video to learn about the Soldiers' National Cemetery and the speech President Lincoln gave there.
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills (TEKS)
A, 16B. 18 A, 18C, 21A,
21C, 22A, 23A, 23C, 24B, 27A, 27B, 27C, 27D, 28B, 29A, 29B, 29C, 291,29J, 30A.30D
SECTION 1: Rebuilding the South......................552
The Big Idea The nation faced many problems in rebuilding the Union.
SECTION 2: The Fight over Reconstruction.............558
The Big Idea The return to power of the pre-war southern leadership led Republicans in Congress to take control of Reconstruction.
SECTION 3: Reconstruction in the South...............564
The Big Idea As Reconstruction ended, African Americans faced new hurdles and the South attempted to rebuild.
SECTION 4: Reconstruction in the West................571b
The Big Idea The Great Plains provided new opportunities for Americans but also caused conflict with Native Americans in the region.

